Maine, session 132, LD602.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1825-D, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 179, §5, is further
amended to read:
1. Notice. For informing the public about contracts and grants for which proposals
are being requested. Notice must also be provided prior to the 3rd renewal period of a
contract, if applicable, or when a contract with a total value greater than $1,000,000 is
renewed;